Hawaii statutes.
§198D-2 Establishment of Hawaii statewide
trail and access program. (a) There is established the Hawaii statewide
trail and access program, to be known as Na Ala Hele. The department of land
and natural resources shall plan, develop, acquire land or rights for public
use of land, construct, restore, and engage in coordination activities to
implement the program in accordance with this chapter.

(b) The trail and access program shall use
funding for the management, maintenance, and development of trails and trail
accesses under the jurisdiction of the department from the following sources:

(1) A portion of the highway fuel taxes collected
under chapter 243;

(2) Federal government grants;

(3) Private contributions;

(4) Fees, established pursuant to administrative
rules and charged by the department for the commercial and other use of trails
and trail accesses under the jurisdiction of the department; and

(5) Transient accommodations tax revenues pursuant to
section 237D-6.5.

(c) The moneys specified in subsection (b)(2)
shall be deposited in the state treasury; provided that moneys received as
deposits or contributions from the federal government shall be accounted for in
accordance with the conditions established by the agencies making the contribution.

(d) The moneys specified in subsection (b)(1),
(3), (4), and (5) shall be deposited in the special land and development fund
under section 171-19 for the management, maintenance, and development of trails
and trail accesses under the jurisdiction of the department; provided that the
moneys specified in subsection (b)(5) shall be expended for the management,
maintenance, and development of trails and access areas frequented by visitors
in response to a master plan developed in coordination with the Hawaii tourism
authority. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 273, §1; am L 1997, c 106,
§2; am L 2002, c 250, §3; am L 2005, c 235, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next